California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(h) Committed assault, battery, or kidnapping, or using force or violence on any person, without proper justification.

(i) Knowingly violated, or advised, encouraged, or assisted the violation of any court order or injunction in the course of business as a licensee.

(j) Acted as a runner or capper for any attorney.

(k) Been convicted of a violation of Section 148 of the Penal Code.

(l) Committed any act
 which is a ground for denial of an application for a license under this chapter.

(m) Committed any act prohibited by Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 630) of Title 15 of Part 1 of the Penal Code.

(n) Purchased, possessed, or transported any tear gas weapon except as authorized by law. A violation of this subdivision may be punished by the suspension of a license for a period to be determined by the director.

(o) Been convicted of a violation of Section 95.3 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 569, Sec. 33.   (SB 559)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7561.2.

Notwithstanding any other law, the failure of any person licensed to do business as a corporation or limited liability company in this state to be registered and in good standing with the Secretary of State and the Franchise Tax Board after notice from the bureau shall result in the automatic suspension of the licensee by operation of law. The bureau shall notify the licensee in writing of its failure to be registered and in good standing with the Secretary of State or Franchise Tax Board, or both, and that the licensee shall be suspended 30 days from the date of the notice if the licensee does not provide proof satisfactory to the bureau that it is properly registered and in good standing with the Secretary of State or Franchise Tax Board, or both. Reinstatement may be made at any time following the suspension by providing
 proof satisfactory to the bureau that the license is properly registered and in good standing and the payment of the reinstatement fee as prescribed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 11.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7561.3.

The director may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter if he or she determines that the licensee or his or her qualified manager, if an individual, or if the licensee is a person other than an individual, that any of its officers, directors, partners, members, managers, or qualified manager, has:

(a) Used any letterhead, advertisement, or other printed matter, or in any manner whatever represented that he or she is an instrumentality of the federal government, a state, or any political subdivision thereof.

(b) Used a name different from that under which he or she is currently licensed in any
 advertisement, solicitation, or contract for business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 569, Sec. 34.   (SB 559)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7561.4.

The director may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter if he or she determines that the licensee or his or her qualified manager, if an individual, or if the licensee is a person other than an individual, that any of its officers, directors, partners, members, managers, or qualified manager, has committed any act in the course of the licensee’s business constituting dishonesty or fraud.

“Dishonesty or fraud” as used in this section, includes, in addition to other acts not specifically enumerated herein:

(a) Knowingly making a false statement relating to evidence or information obtained in the course of
 employment, or knowingly publishing a slander or a libel in the course of business.

(b) Using illegal means in the collection or attempted collection of a debt or obligation.

(c) Manufacture of evidence.

(d) Acceptance of employment adverse to a client or former client relating to a matter with respect to which the licensee has obtained confidential information by reason of or in the course of his or her employment by the client or former client.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 569, Sec. 35.   (SB 559)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7562.

The record of conviction, or a certified copy thereof, shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction as that term is used in this article, Section 7538, or Section 480.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article, Section 7538, or Section 480. The director may order the license suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7563.

The director, in lieu of suspending or revoking a license issued under this chapter for violations of Sections 7561.1, 7561.3, and 7561.4, may impose a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for the first violation, and one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation thereafter, upon a licensee, if the director determines that this action better serves the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 15.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7564.

If, upon investigation, the director determines a licensee, including a corporation, or registrant is in violation of Section 7542.12 or 7566, the director may issue a citation to the licensee or registrant. The citation shall be in writing and shall describe with particularity the nature of the violation, including specific reference to the provision of law determined to have been violated. If the director deems it appropriate, the citation may contain an order of abatement fixing a reasonable time for abatement of the violation and may contain an assessment of an administrative fine. The amount of the fine shall in no event exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or as otherwise provided in this chapter, whichever is less.

A citation or fine assessment shall inform the licensee or registrant that if they
 contest the finding of a violation, they may request a hearing in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code if they wish to contest the findings of a violation and if a hearing is not requested, payment of any fines shall not constitute an admission of the violation charged.

If the licensee or registrant neither requests a hearing, nor pays the assessed fine within 30 days of the assessment, the license or registration of the person shall not be renewed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter until the assessed fine is paid.

Administrative fines collected pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 377, Sec. 13.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7564.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 7561.1 and 7561.4 or any other provision of law, the director may revoke, suspend, or deny at any time a license under this chapter on any of the grounds for disciplinary action provided in this chapter. The proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have all the powers granted therein.

(b) The director may deny a license to an applicant on any of the grounds specified in Section 480.

(c) In addition to the requirements provided in Sections 485 and 486, upon denial of an application for a license, the director shall provide a statement of reasons for the denial that does the following:

(1) Evaluates evidence of rehabilitation submitted by the applicant, if any.

(2) Provides the director’s criteria relating to rehabilitation, formulated pursuant to Section 482, that takes into account the age and severity of the offense, and the evidence relating to participation in treatment or other rehabilitation programs.

(3) If the director’s decision was based on the applicant’s prior criminal conviction, justifies the director’s denial of a license and conveys the reasons why the prior criminal conviction is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensed private investigator.

(d) Commencing July 1, 2009, all of the following shall apply:

(1) If the denial of a license is due at least in part to the applicant’s state or federal criminal history record, the director shall, in addition to the information provided pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), provide to the applicant a copy of his or her criminal history record if the applicant makes a written request to the director for a copy, specifying an address to which it is to be sent.

(A) The state or federal criminal history record shall not be modified or altered from its form or content as provided by the Department of Justice.

(B) The criminal history record shall be provided in such a manner as to protect the confidentiality and privacy of the applicant’s criminal history record and the criminal history record shall not be made available by the director to any employer.

(C) The director shall retain a copy of the applicant’s written request and a copy of the response sent to the applicant, which shall include the date and the address to which the response was sent.

(2) The director shall make that information available upon request by the Department of Justice or the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 487, the director shall conduct a hearing of a license denial within 90 days of receiving an applicant’s request for a hearing. For all other hearing requests, the director shall determine when the hearing shall be conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 675, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

7565.

Any person who knowingly falsifies the fingerprints or photographs submitted pursuant to any provision of this chapter is guilty of a felony. Any person who violates any of the other provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7566.

The director may assess administrative fines of fifty dollars ($50) against any licensee, qualified manager, or firearms qualification cardholder for each violation for failure to notify the bureau within 30 days of any change of residence or business address. The principal place of business may be at a home or at a business address, but it shall be the place at which the licensee maintains a permanent office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 16.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7567.

The bureau may require a licensee who violates any provision of this chapter to do either of the following:

(a) Satisfactorily complete relevant coursework as determined by the bureau.

(b) Retake the licensing examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 309, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Revenue [7570. - 7573.]

7570.

The fees prescribed by this chapter are as follows:

(a) The application and examination fee for an original license shall be at least three hundred forty dollars ($340) and may be increased to not more than three hundred seventy-four dollars ($374).

(b) The application fee for an original branch office certificate shall be at least ninety dollars ($90) and may be increased to not more than ninety-nine dollars ($99).

(c) The fee for an original license for a private investigator shall be at least three hundred eighty-five dollars ($385) and may be increased to not more than four hundred twenty-four dollars ($424).

(d) The fee for a qualified manager license pursuant to Section 7525.2 shall be at least three hundred fifty dollars ($350) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed three hundred eighty-five dollars ($385).

(e) The renewal fee is as follows:

(1) For a license as a private investigator, the fee shall be at least two hundred sixty-five dollars ($265) and may be increased to not more than two hundred ninety-two dollars ($292).

(2) For a branch office certificate for a private investigator, the fee shall be at least sixty-five dollars ($65) and may be increased to not more than seventy-two dollars ($72).

(3) For a qualified manager license, the fee shall be at least two hundred twenty-five
 dollars ($225) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed two hundred forty-eight dollars ($248).

(f) The delinquency fee is 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the date of expiration.

(g) A reinstatement fee is equal to the amount of the renewal fee plus the regular delinquency fee.

(h) The fee for reexamination of an applicant or their qualified manager shall be at least sixty dollars ($60) and may be increased to not more than sixty-six dollars ($66).

(i) The processing fee for the assignment of a license pursuant to Section 7530 shall be at least four hundred dollars ($400) and may be increased to not more than four hundred forty dollars ($440).

(j) The firearms permit fee
 shall be at least one hundred dollars ($100), but shall not exceed one hundred ten dollars ($110).

(k) The firearms permit renewal fee shall be at least eighty dollars ($80), but shall not exceed eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(l) The replacement fee for a lost or destroyed registration card, license, certificate, or permit authorized by this chapter shall be twenty-five dollars ($25). A request to replace a lost or destroyed registration card, license, certificate, or permit shall be made in the manner prescribed by the bureau.

(m) The fee for a Certificate of Licensure, as specified in Section 7528, shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

(n) The fee for an endorsed verification of licensure, certification, or permit shall be twenty-five dollars ($25). The
 verification document shall include the history and current status of the license, certificate, or permit number, the date of the endorsement, an embossed seal, and the signature of the chief.

(o) The reinstatement fee following a suspension pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 7520.3 shall be no more than 50 percent of the renewal fee.

(p) The reinstatement fee following a suspension pursuant to Section 7561.2 shall be 25 percent of the renewal fee.

(q) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 21) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7570.1.

The fee for processing fingerprints for all registrations and licenses is that amount charged the bureau by the Department of Justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7571.

(a) The bureau shall report each month to the Controller the amount and source of all revenue received pursuant to this chapter and shall pay the entire amount thereof into the State Treasury for credit to the Private Security Services Fund.

(b) All moneys paid into the Private Security Services Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be used for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 377, Sec. 17.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7572.

All money derived from the licensing and regulation of private investigators shall be expended exclusively on the licensing and regulation of private investigators. If, at the end of any fiscal year, the money derived from the licensing of private investigators and not expended pursuant to this section is an amount which equals or is more than the money necessary for the regulation of private investigators for the next two fiscal years, license or other fees shall be reduced during the following fiscal year in an amount which will reduce any surplus money derived from the licensing of private investigators to an amount less than the money expended for the regulation of private investigators for the next two fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7573.

Application or license fees shall not be refunded except in accordance with Section 158.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Review [7573.5. - 7573.5.]

7573.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, the powers and duties of the bureau, as set forth in this chapter, shall be subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. The review shall be performed as if this chapter were scheduled to be repealed as of January 1, 2029.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 25.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11.4. Proprietary Security Services [7574. - 7576.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [7574. - 7574.09.]

7574.

This chapter may be cited as the Proprietary Security Services Act.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 741)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 7574.08.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.01.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Bureau” means the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services.

(b) “Chief” means the Chief of the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services.

(c) “Director” means the Director of Consumer Affairs, unless the context indicates otherwise.

(d) “Federally recognized tribe” means a tribe located in this state and included on the list published in the Federal Register pursuant to the Federally Recognized Indian Tribe List Act of 1994 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 5131) and includes an entity controlled by and
 established for the benefit of one or more tribes. 

(e) “Person” includes any individual, firm, company, association, organization, partnership, and corporation.

(f) “Proprietary private security employer” means a person who has one or more employees who provide security services for the employer and only for the employer. A person who employs proprietary private security officers pursuant to this chapter at more than one location shall be considered a single employer.

(g) “Proprietary private security officer” means an unarmed individual who is employed exclusively by any one employer whose primary duty is to provide security services for their employer, whose services are not contracted to any other entity or person, and who is not exempt pursuant to Section 7582.2, and who meets both of the following criteria:

(1) Is required to wear a distinctive uniform clearly identifying the individual as a security officer.

(2) Is likely to interact with the public while performing their duties.

(h) “Registrant” means an individual registered with the bureau under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 26.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.02.

The director shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 741)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 7574.08.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.03.

Every power granted or duty imposed upon the director under this chapter may be exercised or performed by any other officer or employee of the Department of Consumer Affairs as authorized by the director, however, the director shall have the supervision of and the responsibility for all powers and duties exercised by those officers and employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 741)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 7574.08.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.04.

The director may, in accordance with the State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and subject to the provisions of Section 159.5, appoint and fix the compensation of inspectors, investigators, and other personnel as may be necessary for the enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 741)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 7574.08.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.05.

The director may adopt regulations as necessary for the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 741)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 7574.08.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.06.

(a) All fees and fines collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(b) All money derived from the registration and regulation of proprietary private security officers and proprietary private security employers registered under this chapter shall be expended exclusively on the registration and regulation of proprietary private security officers and proprietary private security employers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 741)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 7574.08.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.08.

This article shall become operative on January 1, 2011.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 741)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date for Article 1, commencing with Section 7574.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.09.

It is the intent of the Legislature, consistent with Section 128.5 of the Business and Professions Code, that the bureau shall not maintain a reserve balance of funds greater than the amount necessary to fund operating expenses of the bureau and that the bureau shall periodically review fees pursuant to this chapter to evaluate the appropriateness of each fee and the regulatory costs associated with each fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 25.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Registration [7574.10. - 7574.16.]

7574.10.

No person shall engage in the business of a proprietary private security officer unless registered with the department pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 741)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 7574.16.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.11.

(a) An applicant seeking registration as a proprietary private security officer shall apply to the department on forms provided by the department.

(b) An application for registration as a proprietary private security officer shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Submission of fingerprints for submission to the Department of Justice.

(A) The department shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for all proprietary private security officer registration
 applicants, as defined by subdivision (f) of Section 7574.01, for the purposes of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions and state or federal arrests and also information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on his or her own recognizance pending trial or appeal.

(B) When received, the Department of Justice shall forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation requests for federal summary criminal history information received pursuant to this section. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response to the department.

(C) The Department of Justice shall provide a state and federal level response to the department pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(D) The department shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for persons described in subdivision (a).

(E) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the request described in this section.

(2) A fee that shall be at least fifty-five dollars ($55) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed sixty dollars ($60).

(c) Upon approval of
 an application for registration as a proprietary private security officer by the director, the chief shall cause to be issued to the applicant a registration card in a form approved by the director. A registration card shall be valid for two years from the date of issue.

(d) A person may work as a proprietary private security officer pending receipt of the registration card if he or she has been approved by the director and carries on his or her person a hardcopy printout of the bureau’s approval from the bureau’s Internet Web site and either a valid driver’s license issued pursuant to Section 12811 of the Vehicle Code or a valid identification card issued pursuant to Section 13000 of the Vehicle Code.

(e) The fee for a lost or destroyed registration card shall be twenty-five
 dollars ($25). The request for a replacement of a registration card, license, or certificate shall be made in the manner prescribed by the bureau.

(f) A registered proprietary private security officer shall apply for renewal biennially with the department on forms provided by the department. The department shall charge a renewal fee that shall be at least forty dollars ($40) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed forty-four dollars ($44).

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 26) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 27.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.12.

No person shall engage in the business of a proprietary private security employer unless registered with the department pursuant to this chapter. However, a proprietary private security employer meeting one of the requirements of Section 7574.14 shall be considered exempt from registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 741)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 7574.16.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.13.

(a) An applicant seeking registration as a proprietary private security employer shall apply to the department on forms provided by the department.

(b) An application for registration as a proprietary private security employer shall include, but not be limited to, a designated responsible person and a fee that shall be at least three hundred fifty dollars ($350) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed three hundred eighty-five dollars ($385).

(c) Upon approval of an application for registration as a proprietary private security employer by the director, the chief shall cause to be issued to the applicant a registration certificate in a form approved by the director. A registration certificate
 shall be valid for two years from the date of issue.

(d) A registered proprietary private security employer shall apply for renewal biennially with the department on forms provided by the department. The department shall charge a renewal fee that shall be at least three hundred fifty dollars ($350) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed three hundred eighty-five dollars ($385).

(e) The fee for the replacement of a lost or destroyed registration card shall be twenty-five dollars ($25). The request for a replacement of a registration card, license, or certificate shall be made in the manner prescribed by the bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 1.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.14.

This chapter shall not apply to the following:

(a) An officer or employee of the United States of America, or of this state or a political subdivision thereof, while the officer or employee is engaged in the performance of their official duties, including uniformed peace officers employed part time by a public agency pursuant to a written agreement between a chief of police or sheriff and the public agency, provided the part-time employment does not exceed 50 hours in a calendar month. 

(b) Patrol special police officers appointed by the police commission of a city, county, or city and county under the express terms of its charter who also under the express terms of the charter (1) are subject to suspension or dismissal
 after a hearing on charges duly filed with the commission after a fair and impartial trial, (2) must be not less than 18 years of age nor more than 40 years of age, (3) must possess physical qualifications prescribed by the commission, and (4) are designated by the police commission as the owners of a certain beat or territory as may be fixed from time to time by the police commission. 

(c) A peace officer of this state or a political subdivision thereof while the peace officer is employed by a private employer to engage in off-duty employment in accordance with Section 1126 of the Government Code. However, nothing herein shall exempt such a peace officer who either contracts for their services or the services of others as a private patrol operator or contracts for their services as or is employed as an armed private security officer. For purposes of this subdivision, “armed security officer” means an individual who carries or uses a firearm in
 the course and scope of that contract or employment.

(d) A retired peace officer of the state or political subdivision thereof when the retired peace officer is employed by a private employer in employment approved by the chief law enforcement officer of the jurisdiction where the employment takes place, provided that the retired officer is in a uniform of a public law enforcement agency, has registered with the bureau on a form approved by the director, and has met any training requirements or their equivalent as established for security personnel under Section 7583.5. This officer may not carry an unloaded and exposed handgun unless the officer is exempted under the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 26361) of Chapter 6 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code, may not carry an unloaded firearm that is not a handgun unless the officer is exempted under the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 26405) of
 Chapter 7 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code, and may not carry a loaded or concealed firearm unless the officer is exempted under the provisions of Sections 25450 to 25475, inclusive, of the Penal Code or Sections 25900 to 25910, inclusive, of the Penal Code or has met the requirements set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 26030 of the Penal Code. However, nothing herein shall exempt the retired peace officer who contracts for their services or the services of others as a private patrol operator.

(e) A peace officer in their official police uniform acting in accordance with subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 70 of the Penal Code.

(f) An unarmed, uniformed security person employed exclusively and regularly by a motion picture studio facility employer who does not provide contract security services for other entities or persons in connection with the affairs of
 that employer only and where there exists an employer-employee relationship if that person at no time carries or uses a deadly weapon, as defined in subdivision (a), in the performance of their duties, which may include, but are not limited to, the following business purposes:

(1) The screening and monitoring access of employees of the same employer.

(2) The screening and monitoring access of prearranged and preauthorized invited guests.

(3) The screening and monitoring of vendors and suppliers.

(4) Patrolling the private property facilities for the safety and welfare of all who have been legitimately authorized to have access to the facility.

(g) An armored contract carrier operating
 armored vehicles pursuant to the authority of the Department of the California Highway Patrol or the Public Utilities Commission, or an armored vehicle guard employed by an armored contract carrier.

(h) A federally recognized tribe that has one or more employees who provide unarmed security services only for the federally recognized tribe and an unarmed individual employed by a federally recognized tribe to provide security services only for the federally recognized tribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 27.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.15.

(a) The director may refuse to approve a proprietary private security officer or proprietary private security employer registration pursuant to this chapter to a person who has had any license or registration revoked, or whose license or registration is under suspension, or who has failed to renew his or her license or registration while it was under suspension.

(b) The director may refuse to issue a proprietary private security officer or proprietary private security employer registration to a person who has committed any act that, if committed by a registrant, would be grounds for refusing to issue a registration, or for the suspension or revocation of a registration issued pursuant to this chapter.

(c) The director may refuse to approve a proprietary private security officer registration pursuant to Section 7574.11 to a person who has committed any act or crime constituting grounds for denial under Section 480.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 741)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 7574.16.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.16.

This article shall become operative on January 1, 2011.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 741)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date for Article 2, commencing with Section 7574.10.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Training [7574.18. - 7574.19.]

7574.18.

(a) Except for a person who has completed the course of training required by Section 7583.45, a person registered and hired as a proprietary private security officer shall complete training in security officer skills within six months from the date upon which registration is issued, or within six months of their employment with a proprietary private security employer.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a course provider shall issue a certificate to a proprietary private security officer upon satisfactory completion of a required course, conducted in accordance with the department’s requirements.

(2) If a proprietary private security employer administers a course of
 training pursuant to this section, that proprietary private security employer shall issue a certificate to a proprietary private security officer for the completion of training in security officer skills that each proprietary private security officer is required to complete, as determined by the department, including, but not limited to, training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force. However, the employer shall not be required to provide a certificate for training courses provided pursuant to a curriculum adopted by the department that are specific to that employer’s business and where the subject of training is not specifically required by the department.

(c) An employer of a proprietary private security officer may provide training programs and courses in addition to the training required in this section.

(d) The department shall develop and
 establish by regulation a standard course and curriculum, which shall include a minimum number of hours of instruction, for the skills training required by subdivision (a) to promote and protect the safety of persons and the security of property. For this purpose, the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 7574.5, as added by Chapter 721 of the Statutes of 2007, are continued in existence, and shall be amended by the department as necessary.

(e) The course of training required by subdivision (a) may be administered, tested, and certified by any proprietary private security employer, organization, or school approved by the department. The department may approve any proprietary private security employer, organization, or school to teach the course.

(f) (1) A proprietary private security employer shall annually provide each employee registered
 pursuant to this chapter with specifically dedicated review or practice of security officer skills prescribed in the training required in this section. The bureau shall adopt and approve by regulation the minimum number of hours required for annual review.

(2) A proprietary private security employer shall maintain at the principal place of business or branch office a record verifying completion of the review or practice training for a period of not less than two years. The records shall be available for inspection by the department upon request.

(g) This section does not apply to a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, who has successfully completed a course of study in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training. This
 section does not apply to armored vehicle guards.

(h) A person registered and hired as a proprietary private security officer may submit Verification of Military Experience and Training (VMET) records that document that the person has completed equivalent military training in lieu of completing a course of training in security officer skills pursuant to subdivision (a). The department shall determine the type of equivalent military training that qualifies to serve as a substitute.

(i) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 697, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 3.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.19.

This article shall become operative on July 1, 2011.
